Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Article 4. Power with Respect to Real Estate.

§ 64.2-521.
Personal representatives to sell real estate devised to be sold, and to receive certain rents.

If the will devises real estate to be sold and no person other than the executor is appointed to sell such real estate, the executor has the power to sell and convey such real estate and to receive the proceeds of sale or the rents and profits of any real estate that the executors are authorized by the will to receive.

Unless a contrary intent is clearly set out in the will, if no executor qualifies, or those qualifying die, resign, or are removed, an administrator with the will annexed has the power to sell or convey the real estate devised by the will to be sold and to receive the proceeds of sale or the rents and profits of any real estate.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 64-136, 64-137; 1968, c. 656, §§ 64.1-146, 64.1-147; 2012, c. 614.

Law Review.

For article, “Updating Virginia’s Probate Law,” see 4 U. Rich. L. Rev. 223 (1970).

For comment on a personal representative’s power to sell realty in Virginia, see 15 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 949 (1974).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 15-250 Fiduciary Powers; No. 16-513 Deed by Executor.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

8A M.J. Executors and Administrators, §§ 78, 130, 131, 338.

§ 64.2-522.
Personal representatives to pay over sale proceeds and rents to persons entitled.

An executor or administrator shall faithfully pay the rents and profits or proceeds of sale of real estate that lawfully come into his possession, or into the possession of any person for him, to such persons entitled thereto.

History.

Code 1950, § 64-141; 1968, c. 656, § 64.1-151; 2012, c. 614.

§ 64.2-523.
Personal representative may execute deed pursuant to written contract of decedent.

When any decedent has executed and delivered a bona fide written contract of sale, purchase option, or other agreement binding such deceased person, his heirs, personal representatives, or assigns, to convey any real property or any interest therein, his personal representatives may execute a deed and do all things necessary to effect the transfer of title to such real property or any interest therein to the purchaser upon the purchaser’s full compliance with the terms and conditions of such contract, option, or agreement. Such transfer shall be as effective as if it had been made by the decedent. The contract, option, or agreement shall be attached to any deed executed by a personal representative pursuant to this section and the clerk shall record such contract, option, or agreement in the deed book. Any personal representative duly qualified in any other state, upon taking an oath that the decedent owed no debts in the Commonwealth and posting bond upon such terms and in such amount as may be fixed by the clerk, but not less than the value of the decedent’s interest to be conveyed, may convey real property or any interest therein under the provisions of this section without qualifying in the Commonwealth.

History.

Code 1950, § 64-138; 1958, c. 416; 1966, c. 346; 1968, c. 656, § 64.1-148; 2012, c. 614.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 15-249 Ancillary Administration; No. 16-512 Deed by Heirs, et seq.

§ 64.2-524.
Validation of certain conveyances by foreign executor.

Every conveyance of real estate within the Commonwealth made prior to June 30, 1986, by the executor under a will that, prior to such sale, has been probated according to the laws of another state without the qualification of the executor in the Commonwealth, shall be as valid and effective to pass the title of such real estate as if the executor had qualified in the Commonwealth, provided that (i) the will under which the executor acted was duly executed according to the laws of the Commonwealth, (ii) the will confers upon the executor the power to convey the real estate, and (iii) an authenticated copy of such will has been admitted to probate in the Commonwealth in the county or city in which the real estate or any part thereof is located.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any conveyance of real estate within the Commonwealth made on or after June 30, 1986, by an executor described in subsection A or the trustee of a testamentary trust established in a will where the will, prior to such sale, has been probated according to the laws of another state shall, without the qualification of the executor or the testamentary trustee in the Commonwealth, be valid and effective to pass the title of such real estate provided that (i) the executor or testamentary trustee had duly qualified according to the laws of the state where the will was probated, (ii) the will under which the executor or testamentary trustee acted was duly executed according to the laws of the Commonwealth as a valid will and confers upon the executor or testamentary trustee the power to convey the real estate so conveyed, and (iii) an authenticated copy of such will has been admitted to probate in the Commonwealth in the county or city in which the real estate or any part thereof is situated.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 64-139, 64-140; 1958, c. 558; 1960, c. 279; 1968, c. 656, §§ 64.1-149, 64.1-150; 1996, c. 93; 2012, cc. 61, 614.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, c. 61 amended former § 64.1-150, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2012, c. 614, cl. 4, the 2012 amendment by Acts 2012, c. 61 has been given effect in this section by rewriting subsection B of this section. Subsection B has been set out in the form above at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 15-249 Ancillary Administration; No. 16-513 Deed by Executor; No. 16-2009 Indemnity Agreement for Sale of Real Estate by Devisees or Executor of Testate Decedent.